test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UHL_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲áaguhl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UHL_STEM_1

     k̲áaguhl+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲áaguhl
     k̲áaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl
     k̲áaguhl+V+RELATIVE: k̲áaguhls
     k̲áaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲áaguhläsaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲áaguhläs
     k̲áaguhl+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhläsaang
     k̲áaguhl+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhläsga
     k̲áaguhl+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhläsaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áaguhläsaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'uuj
     k̲áaguhl+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'uujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲áaguhläsaa'uujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'us
     k̲áaguhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áaguhl'ujaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'uujaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhläsaa'us
     k̲áaguhl+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲áaguhläsaa'ahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲áaguhläseehl
     k̲áaguhl+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲áaguhl'uu
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'waa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'waa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'waang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲áaguhl'wägan
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áaguhl'aawaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲áaguhl'aawaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲áaguhl'waas
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲áaguhl'aawaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áaguhl'waa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áaguhl'aawaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'wägiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'wägaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'wägaangaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲áaguhl'waaäsaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲áaguhl'waaäs
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waaäsaang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waaäsga
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waaäsaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áaguhl'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'waa'uuj
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'waa'uujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲áaguhl'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'waa'us
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áaguhl'waa'ujaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waaäsaa'us
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲áaguhl'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲áaguhl'waa'ahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲áaguhl'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲áaguhl'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲áaguhl'waa'ahl
     k̲áaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲áaguhl'waaäseehl
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲áaguhl'ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'angga
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'anggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: k̲áaguhl'anggan
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áaguhl'aangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲áaguhl'aangaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: k̲áaguhl'ans
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲áaguhl'aangaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áaguhl'angang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áaguhl'aangaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'anggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'anggiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'anggaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'anggaangaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲áaguhl'angäsaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲áaguhl'angäs
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'angäsaang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'angäsga
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'angäsaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áaguhl'angäsaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang'uuj
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang'uujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲áaguhl'angäsaa'uujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang'us
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áaguhl'ang'ujaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'ang'uujaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'angäsaa'us
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'aang'ahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲áaguhl'aang'ahlanggan
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'aang'ahlanggiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'angäsaa'ahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲áaguhl'aang'ahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲áaguhl'aangaa'ahlang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲áaguhl'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'aangaa'ahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: k̲áaguhl'aang'ahl
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲áaguhl'angäseehl
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲áaguhl'ang'uu
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang'waang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲áaguhl'ang'wägan
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áaguhl'ang'aawaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲áaguhl'ang'aawaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲áaguhl'ang'waas
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲áaguhl'ang'aawaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áaguhl'ang'aawaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'ang'wägiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'ang'wägaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'ang'wägaangaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲áaguhl'ang'waaäsaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲áaguhl'ang'waaäs
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'ang'waaäsaang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'ang'waaäsga
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'ang'waaäsaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áaguhl'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa'uuj
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa'uujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲áaguhl'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa'us
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa'ujaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'ang'waaäsaa'us
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲áaguhl'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa'ahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲áaguhl'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲áaguhl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲áaguhl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲áaguhl'ang'waa'ahl
     k̲áaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲áaguhl'ang'waaäseehl
